02_Morphology/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 

 %{э%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{с%}:0 %{а%}:0
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
%{ъ%}:0
;

Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} %{а%} ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е %{э%} ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;
ArchiVwl = %{ъ%} ;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                     %{м%}: %>:  _ н ; 
					[BackVow: - ArchiVwl:] %>: _ н ;

"Non surface {Ă} in plural genitive"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>: _ н ; 

"Non surface {м} in plural genitive"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ;

"Non surface {Ă} in singular genitive (root ends in vowel)"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [[BackVow: | FrontVow:] -ArchiVwl:]%>: _ н ;
